Mississippi, session 2026, HB1194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 25-11-111, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-11-111.  (a)  (1)  Any member who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, upon withdrawal from service upon or after attainment of the age of sixty (60) years who has completed at least four (4) years of membership service, or any member who became a member of the system before July 1, 2011, upon withdrawal from service regardless of age who has completed at least twenty-five (25) years of creditable service, shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance, which shall begin on the first of the month following the date the member's application for the allowance is received by the board, but in no event before withdrawal from service. (2)  Any member who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, * * *but before March 1, 2026, upon withdrawal from service upon or after attainment of the age of sixty (60) years who has completed at least eight (8) years of membership service, or any member who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2011, * * *but before March 1, 2026, upon withdrawal from service regardless of age who has completed at least thirty (30) years of creditable service, shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance, which shall begin on the first of the month following the date the member's application for the allowance is received by the board, but in no event before withdrawal from service. * * *(3)  Any member who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, upon withdrawal from service upon or after attainment of the age of sixty‑two (62) years who has completed at least eight (8) years of membership service, or upon withdrawal from service regardless of age who has completed at least thirty‑five (35) years of creditable service, shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance, which shall begin on the first of the month following the date the member's application for the allowance is received by the board, but in no event before withdrawal from service. (b)  (1)  Any member who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, whose withdrawal from service occurs before attaining the age of sixty (60) years who has completed four (4) or more years of membership service and has not received a refund of his accumulated contributions, shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance, beginning upon his attaining the age of sixty (60) years, of the amount earned and accrued at the date of withdrawal from service.  The retirement allowance shall begin on the first of the month following the date the member's application for the allowance is received by the board, but in no event before withdrawal from service. (2)  Any member who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, * * *but before March 1, 2026, whose withdrawal from service occurs before attaining the age of sixty (60) years who has completed eight (8) or more years of membership service and has not received a refund of his accumulated contributions, shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance, beginning upon his attaining the age of sixty (60) years, of the amount earned and accrued at the date of withdrawal from service.  The retirement allowance shall begin on the first of the month following the date the member's application for the allowance is received by the board, but in no event before withdrawal from service. * * *(3)  Any member who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, whose withdrawal from service occurs before attaining the age of sixty‑two (62) years who has completed eight (8) or more years of membership service and has not received a refund of his accumulated contributions, shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance, beginning upon his attaining the age of sixty‑two (62) years, of the amount earned and accrued at the date of withdrawal from service.  The retirement allowance shall begin on the first of the month following the date the member's application for the allowance is received by the board, but in no event before withdrawal from service. (c)  Any member in service who has qualified for retirement benefits may select any optional method of settlement of retirement benefits by notifying the Executive Director of the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees' Retirement System in writing, on a form prescribed by the board, of the option he has selected and by naming the beneficiary of the option and furnishing necessary proof of age.  The option, once selected, may be changed at any time before actual retirement or death, but upon the death or retirement of the member, the optional settlement shall be placed in effect upon proper notification to the executive director. (d)  Any member who became a member of the system before July 1, 2011, shall be entitled to an annual retirement allowance which shall consist of: (1)  A member's annuity, which shall be the actuarial equivalent of the accumulated contributions of the member at the time of retirement computed according to the actuarial table in use by the system; and (2)  An employer's annuity, which, together with the member's annuity provided above, shall be equal to two percent (2%) of the average compensation for each year of service up to and including twenty-five (25) years of creditable service, and two and one-half percent (2-1/2%) of the average compensation for each year of service exceeding twenty-five (25) years of creditable service. (3)  Any retired member or beneficiary thereof who was eligible to receive a retirement allowance before July 1, 1991, and who is still receiving a retirement allowance on July 1, 1992, shall receive an increase in the annual retirement allowance of the retired member equal to one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) of the average compensation for each year of state service in excess of twenty-five (25) years of membership service up to and including thirty (30) years.  The maximum increase shall be five-eighths of one percent (5/8 of 1%).  In no case shall a member who has been retired before July 1, 1987, receive less than Ten Dollars ($10.00) per month for each year of creditable service and proportionately for each quarter year thereof.  Persons retired on or after July 1, 1987, shall receive at least Ten Dollars ($10.00) per month for each year of service and proportionately for each quarter year thereof reduced for the option selected. However, such Ten Dollars ($10.00) minimum per month for each year of creditable service shall not apply to a retirement allowance computed under Section 25-11-114 based on a percentage of the member's average compensation. (e)  Any member who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2011, but before March 1, 2026, shall be entitled to an annual retirement allowance which shall consist of: (1)  A member's annuity, which shall be the actuarial equivalent of the accumulated contributions of the member at the time of retirement computed according to the actuarial table in use by the system; and (2)  An employer's annuity, which, together with the member's annuity provided above, shall be equal to two percent (2%) of the average compensation for each year of service up to and including thirty (30) years of creditable service, and two and one-half percent (2-1/2%) of average compensation for each year of service exceeding thirty (30) years of creditable service. (f)  Any member who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2011, but before March 1, 2026, upon withdrawal from service upon or after attaining the age of sixty (60) years who has completed at least eight (8) years of membership service, or any such member upon withdrawal from service regardless of age who has completed at least thirty (30) years of creditable service, shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance computed in accordance with the formula set forth in subsection (e) of this section.  In the case of the retirement of any member who has attained age sixty (60) but who has not completed at least thirty (30) years of creditable service, the retirement allowance shall be computed in accordance with the formula set forth in subsection (e) of this section except that the total annual retirement allowance shall be reduced by an actuarial equivalent factor for each year of creditable service below thirty (30) years or the number of years in age that the member is below age sixty-five (65), whichever is less. (g)  Any member who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, upon withdrawal from service upon or after attainment of the age of * * *sixty‑five (65) sixty (60) years who has completed at least eight (8) years of membership service, * * *or upon withdrawal from service at the age of sixty‑two (62) who has completed at least thirty (30) years of creditable service, or upon withdrawal from service regardless of age who has completed at least * * *thirty‑five (35) thirty (30) years of creditable service, shall be entitled to an annual retirement allowance which shall consist of a member's annuity, which annuity shall be equal to one percent (1%) of the average compensation for each year of creditable service. In the case of the retirement of any member who has attained the age of * * *sixty‑two (62) sixty (60) but has not completed at least thirty (30) years of creditable service, the total annual retirement allowance specified in this subsection (g) shall be reduced by an actuarial equivalent factor for each year of creditable service below thirty (30) years or the number of years in age that the member is below age sixty-five (65), whichever is less. (h)  No member, except members excluded by the Age Discrimination in Employment Act Amendments of 1986 (Public Law 99-592), under either Article 1 or Article 3 in state service shall be required to retire because of age. (i)  No payment on account of any benefit granted under the provisions of this section shall become effective or begin to accrue until January 1, 1953. (j)  (1)  A retiree or beneficiary may, on a form prescribed by and filed with the retirement system, irrevocably waive all or a portion of any benefits from the retirement system to which the retiree or beneficiary is entitled.  The waiver shall be binding on the heirs and assigns of any retiree or beneficiary and the same must agree to forever hold harmless the Public Employees' Retirement System of Mississippi from any claim to the waived retirement benefits. (2)  Any waiver under this subsection shall apply only to the person executing the waiver.  A beneficiary shall be entitled to benefits according to the option selected by the member at the time of retirement.  However, a beneficiary may, at the option of the beneficiary, execute a waiver of benefits under this subsection. (3)  The retirement system shall retain in the annuity reserve account amounts that are not used to pay benefits because of a waiver executed under this subsection. (4)  The board of trustees may provide rules and regulations for the administration of waivers under this subsection. SECTION 2.  Section 25-11-114, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-11-114.  (1)  The applicable benefits provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall be paid to eligible beneficiaries of any member who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, and has completed four (4) or more years of membership service, or who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, and has completed eight (8) or more years of membership service, and who dies before retirement and who has not filed a Pre-Retirement Optional Retirement Form as provided in Section 25-11-111. (2)  (a)  The surviving spouse of a member who dies before retirement shall receive a monthly benefit computed in accordance with paragraph (d) of this subsection (2) as if the member had nominated his spouse as beneficiary if: (i)  The member completed the requisite minimum number of years of membership service to qualify for a retirement allowance at age sixty (60) * * *, for any member who became a member of the system before March 1, 2026, or at age sixty‑two (62), for any member who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026; (ii)  The spouse has been married to the member for not less than one (1) year preceding the death of the member; (iii)  The member has not exercised any other option. (b)  If, at the time of the member's death, there are no dependent children, and the surviving spouse, who otherwise would receive the annuity under this subsection (2), has filed with the system a signed written waiver of his or her rights to the annuity and that waiver was in effect at the time of the member's death, a lump-sum distribution of the deceased member's accumulated contributions shall be refunded in accordance with Section 25-11-117. (c)  The spouse annuity shall begin on the first day of the month following the date of the member's death, but in case of late filing, retroactive payments will be made for a period of not more than one (1) year. (d)  The spouse of a member who is eligible to receive a monthly benefit under paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall receive a benefit for life equal to the higher of the following: (i)  The greater of twenty percent (20%) of the deceased member's average compensation as defined in Section 25-11-103 at the time of death or Fifty Dollars ($50.00) monthly; or (ii)  Benefits calculated under Option 2 of Section 25-11-115.  The method of calculating the retirement benefits shall be on the same basis as provided in Section 25-11-111(d), (e) or (g), as applicable.  However, if the member dies before being qualified for a full, unreduced retirement allowance, then the benefits shall be reduced by an actuarially determined percentage or factor based on the lesser of either the number of years of service credit or the number of years in age required to qualify for a full, unreduced retirement allowance in Section 25-11-111(d), (e) or (g), as applicable. (e)  The surviving spouse of a deceased member who previously received spouse retirement benefits under paragraph (d)(i) of this subsection from and after July 1, 1992, and whose benefits were terminated before July 1, 2004, because of remarriage, may again receive the retirement benefits authorized under paragraph (d)(i) of this subsection by making application with the board to reinstate those benefits. Any reinstatement of the benefits shall be prospective only and shall begin after the first of the month following the date of the application for reinstatement, but no earlier than July 1, 2004.  From and after July 1, 2010, any spouse who chose Option 2 from and after July 1, 1992, but before July 1, 2004, where the benefit, although payable for life, was less than the benefit available under the calculation in paragraph (d)(i) of this subsection shall have his or her benefit increased to the amount which provides the greater benefit. (3)  (a)  Subject to the maximum limitation provided in this paragraph, the member's dependent children each shall receive an annuity of the greater of ten percent (10%) of the member's average compensation as defined in Section 25-11-103 at the time of the death of the member or Fifty Dollars ($50.00) monthly; however, if there are more than three (3) dependent children, each dependent child shall receive an equal share of a total annuity equal to thirty percent (30%) of the member's average compensation, provided that the total annuity shall not be less than One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00) per month for all children. (b)  A child shall be considered to be a dependent child until marriage, or the attainment of age nineteen (19), whichever comes first; however, this age limitation shall be extended beyond age nineteen (19), but in no event beyond the attainment of age twenty-three (23), as long as the child is a student regularly pursuing a full-time course of resident study or training in an accredited high school, trade school, technical or vocational institute, junior or community college, college, university or comparable recognized educational institution duly licensed by a state.  A student child who is receiving a retirement allowance as of June 30, 2016, whose birthday falls during the school year (September 1 through June 30) is considered not to reach age twenty-three (23) until the July 1 following the actual twenty-third birthday.  A full-time course of resident study or training means a day or evening noncorrespondence course that includes school attendance at the rate of at least thirty-six (36) weeks per academic year or other applicable period with a subject load sufficient, if successfully completed, to attain the educational or training objective within the period generally accepted as minimum for completion, by a full-time day student, of the academic or training program concerned.  Any child who is physically or mentally incompetent, as adjudged by either a Mississippi court of competent jurisdiction or by the board, shall receive benefits for as long as the incompetency exists. (c)  If there are more than three (3) dependent children, upon a child's ceasing to be a dependent child, his annuity shall terminate and there shall be a redetermination of the amounts payable to any remaining dependent children. (d)  Annuities payable under this subsection (3) shall begin the first day of the month following the date of the member's death or in case of late filing, retroactive payments will be made for a period of not more than one (1) year.  Those benefits may be paid to a surviving parent or the lawful custodian of a dependent child for the use and benefit of the child without the necessity of appointment as guardian. (4)  (a)  Death benefits in the line of duty.  Regardless of the number of years of the member's creditable service, the spouse and/or the dependent children of an active member who is killed or dies as a direct result of a physical injury sustained from an accident or a traumatic event caused by external violence or physical force occurring in the line of performance of duty shall qualify, on approval of the board, for a retirement allowance on the first of the month following the date of death, but in the case of late filing, retroactive payments will be made for a period of not more than one (1) year.  The spouse shall receive a retirement allowance for life equal to one-half (1/2) of the average compensation as defined in Section 25-11-103.  In addition to the retirement allowance for the spouse, or if there is no surviving spouse, the member's dependent child shall receive a retirement allowance in the amount of one-fourth (1/4) of the member's average compensation as defined in Section 25-11-103; however, if there are two (2) or more dependent children, each dependent child shall receive an equal share of a total annuity equal to one-half (1/2) of the member's average compensation.  If there are more than two (2) dependent children, upon a child's ceasing to be a dependent child, his annuity shall terminate and there shall be a redetermination of the amounts payable to any remaining dependent children. Those benefits shall cease to be paid for the support and maintenance of each child upon the child attaining the age of nineteen (19) years; however, the spouse shall continue to be eligible for the aforesaid retirement allowance. Those benefits may be paid to a surviving parent or lawful custodian of the children for the use and benefit of the children without the necessity of appointment as guardian.  Any spouse who received spouse retirement benefits under this paragraph (a) from and after April 4, 1984, and whose benefits were terminated before July 1, 2004, because of remarriage, may again receive the retirement benefits authorized under this paragraph (a) by making application with the board to reinstate those benefits.  Any reinstatement of the benefits shall be prospective only and shall begin after the first of the month following the date of the application for reinstatement, but not earlier than July 1, 2004. (b)  A child shall be considered to be a dependent child until marriage, or the attainment of age nineteen (19), whichever comes first; however, this age limitation shall be extended beyond age nineteen (19), but in no event beyond the attainment of age twenty-three (23), as long as the child is a student regularly pursuing a full-time course of resident study or training in an accredited high school, trade school, technical or vocational institute, junior or community college, college, university or comparable recognized educational institution duly licensed by a state.  A student child who is receiving a retirement allowance as of June 30, 2016, whose birthday falls during the school year (September 1 through June 30) is considered not to reach age twenty-three (23) until the July 1 following the actual twenty-third birthday.  A full-time course of resident study or training means a day or evening noncorrespondence course that includes school attendance at the rate of at least thirty-six (36) weeks per academic year or other applicable period with a subject load sufficient, if successfully completed, to attain the educational or training objective within the period generally accepted as minimum for completion, by a full-time day student, of the academic or training program concerned.  Any child who is physically or mentally incompetent, as adjudged by either a Mississippi court of competent jurisdiction or by the board, shall receive benefits for as long as the incompetency exists. (5)  If all the annuities provided for in this section payable on account of the death of a member terminate before there has been paid an aggregate amount equal to the member's accumulated contributions standing to the member's credit in the annuity savings account at the time of the member's death, the difference between the accumulated contributions and the aggregate amount of annuity payments shall be paid to the person that the member has nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the board.  If there is no designated beneficiary surviving at termination of benefits, the difference shall be payable under Section 25-11-117.1(1). (6)  Regardless of the number of years of creditable service, upon the application of a member or employer, any active member who becomes disabled as a direct result of a physical injury sustained from an accident or traumatic event caused by external violence or physical force occurring in the line of performance of duty, provided that the medical board or other designated governmental agency after a medical examination certifies that the member is mentally or physically incapacitated for the further performance of duty and the incapacity is likely to be permanent, may be retired by the board of trustees on the first of the month following the date of filing the application but in no event shall the retirement allowance begin before the termination of state service.  If a member who has been approved for a retirement allowance under this subsection does not terminate state service within ninety (90) days after the approval, the retirement allowance and the application for the allowance shall be void. The retirement allowance shall equal the allowance on disability retirement as provided in Section 25-11-113 but shall not be less than fifty percent (50%) of average compensation.  Line of duty disability benefits under this section shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of Section 25-11-113(1)(b), (c), (d), (e) and (f), (3), (4), (5) and (6). (7)  For purposes of determining death or disability benefits under this section, the following shall apply: (a)  Death or permanent and total disability resulting from a cardiovascular, pulmonary or musculoskeletal condition that was not a direct result of a physical injury sustained from an accident or a traumatic event caused by external violence or physical force occurring in the performance of duty shall be deemed a natural death or an ordinary disability. (b)  A mental disability based exclusively on employment duties occurring on an ongoing basis shall be deemed an ordinary disability. (8)  If the deceased or disabled member has less than four (4) years of membership service, the average compensation as defined in Section 25-11-103 shall be the average of all annual earned compensation in state service for the purposes of benefits provided in this section. (9)  In case of death or total and permanent disability under subsection (4) or subsection (6) of this section and before the board shall consider any application for a retirement allowance, the employer must certify to the board that the member's death or disability was a direct result of an accident or a traumatic event occurring during and as a result of the performance of the regular and assigned duties of the employee and that the death or disability was not the result of the willful negligence of the employee. (10)  The application for the retirement allowance must be filed within one (1) year after death of an active member who is killed in the line of performance of duty or dies as a direct result of an accident occurring in the line of performance of duty or traumatic event; but the board of trustees may consider an application for disability filed after the one-year period if it can be factually demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board of trustees that the disability is due to the accident and that the filing was not accomplished within the one-year period due to a delayed manifestation of the disability or to circumstances beyond the control of the member.  However, in case of late filing, retroactive payments will be made for a period of not more than one (1) year only. (11)  (a)  Notwithstanding any other section of this article and in lieu of any payments to a designated beneficiary for a refund of contributions under Section 25-11-117, the spouse and/or children shall be eligible for the benefits payable under this section, and the spouse may elect, for both the spouse and/or children, to receive benefits in accordance with either subsections (2) and (3) or subsection (4) of this section; otherwise, the contributions to the credit of the deceased member shall be refunded in accordance with Section 25-11-117. (b)  Notwithstanding any other section of this article, a spouse who is entitled to receive a monthly benefit under either subsection (2) or (4) of this section and who is also the named beneficiary for a refund of accumulated contributions in the member's annuity savings account, may, after the death of the member, elect to receive a refund of accumulated contributions in lieu of a monthly allowance, provided that there are no dependent children entitled to benefits under subsection (3) of this section. (12)  If the member has previously received benefits from the system to which he was not entitled and has not repaid in full all amounts payable by him to the system, the annuity amounts otherwise provided by this section shall be withheld and used to effect repayment until the total of the withholdings repays in full all amounts payable by him to the system. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after March 1, 2026.